Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201981-5,165
Act, how cited.

Sections 81-5,165 to 81-5,189 shall be known and may be cited as the Boiler Inspection Act.

Laws 1987, LB 462, § 1;

Laws 1988, LB 863, § 1;

Laws 1995, LB 438, § 1;

R.S.1943, (2010), § 48-719;

Laws 2019, LB301, § 1.